Louisiana, session 2026, HB1075.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The sum of One Million Six Hundred Ten Thousand Four Hundred
Ninety-Three and 43/100 ($1,610,493.43) Dollars plus interest is hereby payable out of the
State General Fund (Direct) for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 for the payment of the judgment
captioned "Dawn Marie DePedro, et al versus State of Louisiana, through the Department
of Transportation and Development", signed on December 13, 2023 and affirmed by the
First Circuit Court of Appeal on July 3, 2025, between the state of Louisiana, through the
Department of Transportation and Development, and Dawn Marie DePedro, Kamden
DePedro, and Dawn Marie DePedro on behalf of her minor child, Alianna DePedro, bearing
number 127,022, Division B, on the docket of the Twenty-Third Judicial District, parish of
Ascension, state of Louisiana.
Section 2. Of the amount appropriated in Section 1 of this Act, an amount equal to
the sum of One Million Thirteen Thousand Five Hundred Six and 35/100 ($1,013,506.35)
Page 1 of 3

HLS 26RS-869 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1075
Dollars, plus interest on the sum from the date of judicial demand until paid as provided by
law and the judgment, is hereby payable for the portion of the judgment against the state of
Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and Development, and in favor of
Dawn Marie DePedro.
Section 3. Of the amount appropriated in Section 1 of this Act, an amount equal to
the sum of Two Hundred Ninety-Eight Thousand Four Hundred Ninety-Three and 54/100
($298,493.54) Dollars, plus interest on the sum from the date of judicial demand until paid
as provided by law and the judgment, is hereby payable for the portion of the judgment
against the state of Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and Development,
and in favor of Kamden DePedro.
Section 4. Of the amount appropriated in Section 1 of this Act, an amount equal to
the sum of Two Hundred Ninety-Eight Thousand Four Hundred Ninety-Three and 54/100
($298,493.54) Dollars, plus interest on the sum from the date of judicial demand until paid
as provided by law and the judgment, is hereby payable for the portion of the judgment
against the state of Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and Development,
and in favor of Dawn Marie DePedro on behalf of her minor child, Alianna DePedro.
Section 5. A judgment may only be paid from this appropriation if it is final and shall
be paid as to principal, court costs, and expert witness fees as awarded in the judgment.
Interest shall be paid as provided by law and awarded in the judgment. If the provisions of
the judgment conflict with the provisions of this Act, the provisions of the judgment shall
be controlling. Any other provision of this Act not in conflict with the provisions of the
judgment shall control. Payment shall be made only after presentation to the state treasurer
of documentation required by the state treasurer. Further, the judgment shall be deemed to
have been paid on the effective date of this Act, and interest shall cease to run as of that date.
Section 6. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 2 of 3

HLS 26RS-869 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1075